District of Columbia statutes.
22-4403

Deposits of deleterious matter in Rock Creek or Potomac River.

No person shall allow any tar, oil, ammoniacal liquor, or other waste products of any gas works or works engaged in using such products, or any waste product whatever of any mechanical, chemical, manufacturing, or refining establishment to flow into or be deposited in Rock Creek or the Potomac River or any of its tributaries within the District of Columbia or into any pipe or conduit leading to the same.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1336, ch. 854, § 901

History

This section is referenced in § 22-4404.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 22-1703.
1973 Ed., § 22-1703.

Prior Codifications